Hawaii statutes.
§373-3 Fees; biennial renewal; restoration.
(a) No applicant shall be examined under this chapter until the appropriate
fees have been paid.

(b) Every person holding a license under this
chapter shall register with the director and pay a biennial renewal fee on or
before June 30 of each even-numbered year. Failure to pay the renewal fee
shall constitute a forfeiture of the license as of the date of expiration. Any
license so forfeited may be restored within one year after the expiration upon
filing of an application and payment of the renewal and restoration fees.

(c) All fees shall be as provided in rules
adopted by the director pursuant to chapter 91. [L 1959, c 264, pt of §3; Supp,
§88A-3; HRS §373-3; am L 1980, c 302, pt of §2; am L 1983, c 84, §1(3); am L
1985, c 135, §3; am L 1992, c 202, §2; am L 2002, c 22, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next